District of Columbia statutes.
29-409.04

Action on a plan of merger or membership exchange.

In the case of a nonprofit corporation that is a party to a merger or membership exchange:

(1)

The plan of merger or membership exchange shall be adopted by the board of directors.

(2)

Except as otherwise provided in paragraph (8) of this section, § 29-409.05, or the articles of incorporation or bylaws, after adopting the plan of merger or membership exchange, the board of directors shall submit the plan to the members entitled to vote on the plan for their approval. The board of directors shall also transmit to the members a recommendation that the members approve the plan, unless the board of directors makes a determination that because of conflicts of interest or other special circumstances, it should not make such a recommendation, in which case the board of directors must transmit to the members the basis for that determination.

(3)

The board of directors may condition its submission of the plan of merger or membership exchange to the members on any basis.

(4)

If the plan of merger or membership exchange is required to be approved by the members, and if the approval is to be given at a meeting, the nonprofit corporation shall give notice to each member entitled to vote on the merger or membership exchange of the meeting of members at which the plan is to be submitted for approval. The notice shall state that the purpose, or one of the purposes, of the meeting is to consider the plan and shall contain or be accompanied by a copy or summary of the plan. If the corporation is to be merged into an existing corporation or eligible entity, the notice shall also include or be accompanied by a copy or summary of the articles of incorporation and bylaws or organic records of that corporation or eligible entity. If the corporation is to be merged into a corporation or eligible entity that is to be created pursuant to the merger, the notice shall include or be accompanied by a copy or a summary of the articles of incorporation and bylaws or organic records of the new corporation or eligible entity.

(5)

Unless the articles of incorporation or bylaws, or the board of directors acting pursuant to paragraph (3) of this subsection, requires a greater vote or a greater number of votes to be present, the approval of the plan of merger or membership exchange by the members shall require the approval of the members at a meeting at which a quorum exists, and, if any class of memberships is entitled to vote as a separate group on the plan of merger or membership exchange, the approval of each such separate voting group at a meeting at which a quorum of the voting group exists.

(6)

Separate voting by voting groups shall be required:

(A)

On a plan of merger, by each class of memberships that:

(i)

Are to be converted into memberships, eligible interests, securities, or obligations; rights to acquire memberships, eligible interests, securities, or obligations; cash; other property or other consideration; or any combination of the foregoing; or

(ii)

Would be entitled to vote as a separate group on a provision in the plan that, if contained in a proposed amendment to articles of incorporation, would require action by separate voting groups under § 29-408.04;

(B)

On a plan of membership exchange, by each class of memberships included in the exchange, with each class constituting a separate voting group; and

(C)

On a plan of merger or membership exchange, if the voting group is entitled under the articles of incorporation to vote as a voting group to approve a plan of merger or membership exchange.

(7)

If as a result of a merger or membership exchange one or more members of a domestic nonprofit corporation would become subject to owner liability for the debts, obligations, or liabilities of any other person or entity, approval of the plan of merger or membership exchange shall require the signature, by each such member, of a separate record consenting to become subject to such owner liability.

(8)

If a domestic nonprofit corporation that is a party to a merger does not have any members entitled to vote thereon, a plan of merger shall be deemed adopted by the corporation when it has been adopted by the board of directors pursuant to paragraph (1) of this subsection.

(9)

In addition to the adoption and approval of the plan of merger by the board of directors and members as required by this section, the plan of merger shall also be approved in the form of a record by any person or group of persons whose approval is required under § 29-408.40 to amend the articles of incorporation or bylaws.

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720